Missouri, session 2026, SB1792.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.647, to read as
follows:
67.647. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be cited as the "Pay Us Back Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Commissioner", the commissioner of the office of
administration;
(2) "Football-related public benefits", the sum of:
(a) Fifty percent of the total amount of
appropriations made to a convention and sports complex fund
pursuant to section 67.641, as adjusted for inflation;
(b) Fifty percent of the total amount of tax credits
issued for the benefit of a sports facility receiving state
appropriations pursuant to sections 67.638 to 67.646;
(c) The total amount of tax credits issued for the
benefit of any practice, training, or other facility owned
or utilized by any professional sports team affiliated with
or franchised by the National Football League that leases a

SB 1792 2
sports facility receiving state appropriations pursuant to
sections 67.638 to 67.646; and
(d) The total amount of any other tax credits or other
public benefits awarded to or on behalf of any professional
sports team affiliated with or franchised by the National
Football League that leases a sports facility receiving
state appropriations pursuant to sections 67.638 to 67.646.
3. By no later than December 31, 2026, the
commissioner shall determine and report to the general
assembly and the governor the total amount of football-
related public benefits received by any professional sports
team affiliated with or franchised by the National Football
League that leases a sports facility receiving state
appropriations pursuant to sections 67.638 to 67.646. For
all calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
and ending on or before December 31, 2031, such professional
sports team shall, for the purpose of reimbursing the state
for football-related public benefits, annually remit to the
department of revenue an amount equal to one-fifth of the
total football-related public benefits, as determined by the
commissioner, which shall be deposited in the "Sports
Facility Remediation Fund", which is hereby established in
the state treasury. The state treasurer shall be custodian
of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

SB 1792 3
4. Seventy-five percent of the moneys in the sports
facility remediation fund shall be used solely for the
demolition or conversion of a sports facility that has
received appropriations pursuant to sections 67.638 to
67.646 in order for such facility to be economically
developed and put to another lawful public or commercial
use. The remaining twenty-five percent of the moneys in the
sports facility remediation fund shall be appropriated to
the department of health and senior services for the
purposes of conducting research on the causes and effects of
chronic traumatic encephalopathy (CTE).
5. The total amount of reimbursements received
pursuant to this section shall not exceed the total amount
of football-related public benefits.
✓